Alaska, session 34, SB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 03.40.090 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 03.40.090. Publication of record. The commissioner shall publish, in 06 book form, a list of all brands and marks on record at the time of the publication. The 07 lists may be supplemented from time to time. The publication must contain a facsimile 08 of all recorded brands and marks, together with the owner's name and mailing address. 09 The records shall be arranged in convenient form for reference. The publication must 10 be made available for download on the Internet website of the division of the 11 department with responsibility for agriculture [THE BOOKS AND 12 SUPPLEMENTS MAY BE SOLD TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC AT AN AMOUNT 13 NOT TO EXCEED $2 A COPY]. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 14.42.035(a) is amended to read: 01 (a) The commission may require the institutions of public and private higher 02 education and other institutions of postsecondary education in the state to submit data 03 on costs, selection, and retention of students, enrollments, education outcomes, plant 04 capacities and use, and other matters pertinent to effective planning and coordination 05 [, AND SHALL FURNISH INFORMATION CONCERNING THESE MATTERS 06 TO THE GOVERNOR, TO THE LEGISLATURE, AND TO OTHER STATE AND 07 FEDERAL AGENCIES AS REQUESTED BY THEM]. 08 * Sec. 3. AS 16.05.130(b) is amended to read: 09 (b) Money accruing to the state from waterfowl conservation tag fees from 10 hunters may not be diverted to a purpose other than (1) the conservation and 11 enhancement of waterfowl; (2) the acquisition, by lease or otherwise, of wetlands that 12 are important for waterfowl and public use of waterfowl in the state; (3) waterfowl 13 related projects approved by the commissioner; (4) the administration of the waterfowl 14 conservation program; and (5) emergencies in the state as determined by the governor. 15 The department shall maintain a state waterfowl tag fee account within the fish and 16 game fund to permit separate accounting records for the receipt and expenditure of 17 money derived from the sale of waterfowl tags. [THE DEPARTMENT SHALL 18 PREPARE A REPORT BEFORE APRIL 15 OF EACH EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR 19 FOR THE PUBLIC AND THE LEGISLATURE ON THE USE OF MONEY 20 DERIVED FROM WATERFOWL CONSERVATION TAGS AND LIMITED 21 EDITION PRINTS. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE LEGISLATURE 22 THAT THE REPORT IS AVAILABLE.] 23 * Sec. 4. AS 18.67.170 is amended to read: 24 Sec. 18.67.170. Reports. The board shall prepare and transmit to the governor, 25 in each odd-numbered year, a biennial report of its activities under this chapter 26 including [A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE FACTS IN EACH CASE AND] the 27 amount of compensation awarded during the preceding two-year period. The board 28 shall notify the legislature that the report is available. 29 * Sec. 5. AS 19.30.400(b) is amended to read: 30 (b) The Department of Natural Resources shall conduct the necessary research 31 to identify rights-of-way that have been accepted by public users under former 43 01 U.S.C. 932 and that have not been previously identified [, AND SHALL ANNUALLY 02 REPORT TO THE LEGISLATURE BY THE FIRST DAY OF EACH REGULAR 03 SESSION OF THE LEGISLATURE ON RIGHTS-OF-WAY THAT HAVE BEEN 04 IDENTIFIED AND THAT ARE NOT LISTED IN THIS SECTION]. 05 * Sec. 6. AS 33.30.017(b) is amended to read: 06 (b) The commissioner shall 07 (1) charge each prisoner who possesses at least one major electrical 08 appliance the utility fee established in (a) of this section; the commissioner may 09 deduct the utility fee monthly from the account established for a prisoner into which 10 money due the prisoner for labor is paid; if a prisoner is indigent, the commissioner 11 shall make the deduction from any amount credited to the indigent inmate's account; 12 (2) if available from legislative appropriation, expend money deducted 13 and collected under (1) of this subsection to offset the cost of the department's utility 14 expenses [; THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ANNUALLY REPORT ON THE 15 AMOUNTS THAT ARE COLLECTED AND EXPENDED UNDER THIS 16 PARAGRAPH]. 17 * Sec. 7. AS 37.13.170 is amended to read: 18 Sec. 37.13.170. Reports and publications. By September 30 of each year, the 19 board shall publish a report of the fund for distribution to the governor and the public. 20 The board shall notify the legislature that the report is available. The report shall be 21 written in easily understandable language. The report must include financial 22 statements audited by independent outside auditors, a statement of the amount of 23 money received by the fund from each investment during the period covered, a 24 statement of investments of the fund including an appraisal at market value, a 25 description of fund investment activity during the period covered by the report, a 26 comparison of the fund performance with the intended goals contained in 27 AS 37.13.020, an examination of the effect of the investment criteria of this chapter on 28 the fund portfolio with recommendations of any needed changes, and any other 29 information the board believes would be of interest to the governor, the legislature, 30 and the public. The annual income statement and balance sheet of the fund shall be 31 posted on the corporation's Internet website [PUBLISHED IN AT LEAST ONE 01 NEWSPAPER IN EACH JUDICIAL DISTRICT]. The income statement and balance 02 sheet for the two fiscal years preceding the publication of the election pamphlet under 03 AS 15.58 shall be included in that pamphlet. 04 * Sec. 8. AS 37.14.720 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 37.14.720. Powers and duties of the commissioner of revenue. In 06 carrying out the investment duties under AS 37.14.700 - 37.14.740, the commissioner 07 of revenue has the powers and duties set out in AS 37.10.071. [THE 08 COMMISSIONER SHALL PROVIDE REPORTS TO THE ADJUTANT GENERAL 09 OF THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS ON THE 10 CONDITION AND INVESTMENT PERFORMANCE OF THE FUND.] 11 * Sec. 9. AS 38.05.180(b) is amended to read: 12 (b) The commissioner shall annually prepare [AND, BEFORE FEBRUARY 1 13 OF EACH CALENDAR YEAR NOTIFY THE LEGISLATURE OF] a five-year 14 program of proposed oil and gas lease sales and proposed gas only lease sales, 15 specifying as precisely as practicable the location of tracts to be offered for leasing 16 during the calendar year of the notification and the following four calendar years. The 17 commissioner may, at any time, notify the legislature of revisions, including additions, 18 to the program. [NOTIFICATION TO EACH LEGISLATOR, BY ELECTRONIC 19 MESSAGE OR OTHER WRITTEN MEANS, CONSTITUTES NOTIFICATION TO 20 THE LEGISLATURE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.] 21 * Sec. 10. AS 44.99.220(a) is amended to read: 22 (a) Each state agency shall 23 (1) compile a list of all publications the agency produces as required 24 by law or regulation or as directed by the legislature; 25 (2) identify and highlight on the list compiled under (1) of this 26 subsection the publications that are 27 (A) outdated, duplicative, or excessive, or that could be 28 improved or consolidated with other publications; or 29 (B) currently delivered physically that could be delivered 30 electronically; and 31 (3) every 10 years, by October 31 [OF EVERY EVEN-NUMBERED 01 YEAR], electronically submit the list of publications compiled under (1) of this 02 subsection, including the highlighted publications under (2) of this subsection, to the 03 governor and to the senate secretary and chief clerk of the house of representatives and 04 notify the legislature that the list is available. 05 * Sec. 11. AS 44.99.220(b) is amended to read: 06 (b) In addition to the budget, bills, and fiscal plan submitted under 07 AS 37.07.020(a) and (b), every 10 years [IN EVERY EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR], 08 the governor shall submit a bill to eliminate or modify publication requirements for 09 publications that have been identified under (a) of this section 10 (1) as outdated, duplicative, or excessive, or that could be improved or 11 consolidated with other publications; or 12 (2) that could be exclusively delivered electronically. 13 * Sec. 12. AS 47.07.039(f) is amended to read: 14 (f) The department shall prepare a plan regarding regional or statewide 15 implementation of a coordinated care project based on the results of the demonstration 16 projects under this section. On or before November 15, 2019, the department shall 17 submit the plan to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of 18 representatives and notify the legislature that the plan is available. [ON OR BEFORE 19 NOVEMBER 15 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL 20 SUBMIT A REPORT REGARDING ANY CHANGES OR RECOMMENDATIONS 21 REGARDING THE PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO THE 22 SENATE SECRETARY AND THE CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE OF 23 REPRESENTATIVES AND NOTIFY THE LEGISLATURE THAT THE REPORT 24 IS AVAILABLE.] 25 * Sec. 13. AS 47.14.112(a) is amended to read: 26 (a) The department shall implement workload standards and a training 27 program for employees who supervise the care of children committed to the 28 supervision or custody of the department under AS 47.10, work with families to 29 prevent the removal of a child from the child's home under AS 47.10, or investigate 30 reports of harm under AS 47.17. [THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PREPARE A 31 STAFFING REPORT UNDER (b) OF THIS SECTION IF THE DEPARTMENT IS 01 UNABLE 02 (1) TO EMPLOY THE NUMBER OF QUALIFIED EMPLOYEES 03 NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT 04 (A) THE DEPARTMENT REASONABLY AND SAFELY 05 MINIMIZES THE TIME A CHILD IS NOT IN A PERMANENT LIVING 06 ARRANGEMENT OR UNDER A PERMANENT GUARDIANSHIP; 07 (B) A CHILD IS NOT REMOVED FROM THE CHILD'S 08 HOME WHEN IT IS POSSIBLE AND IN THE CHILD'S BEST INTEREST 09 FOR THE DEPARTMENT TO WORK WITH THE CHILD'S FAMILY TO 10 PREVENT THE REMOVAL OF THE CHILD FROM THE CHILD'S HOME; 11 (C) EACH CHILD IS PLACED IN A PERMANENT HOME 12 NOT MORE THAN 24 MONTHS AFTER THE DATE THE CHILD IS 13 FIRST REMOVED FROM THE CHILD'S HOME; 14 (2) TO MEET BEST PRACTICES STANDARDS SET BY THE 15 DEPARTMENT REQUIRING THE EMPLOYMENT OF MENTORS FOR 16 EMPLOYEES WHO SUPERVISE THE CARE OF CHILDREN COMMITTED TO 17 THE SUPERVISION OR CUSTODY OF THE DEPARTMENT UNDER AS 47.10, 18 WORK WITH FAMILIES TO PREVENT THE REMOVAL OF A CHILD FROM 19 THE CHILD'S HOME UNDER AS 47.10, OR INVESTIGATE REPORTS OF 20 HARM UNDER AS 47.17; 21 (3) FOR A NEW EMPLOYEE WHO SUPERVISES THE CARE OF 22 A CHILD COMMITTED TO THE SUPERVISION OR CUSTODY OF THE 23 DEPARTMENT UNDER AS 47.10, WORKS WITH FAMILIES TO PREVENT 24 THE REMOVAL OF A CHILD FROM THE CHILD'S HOME UNDER AS 47.10, 25 OR INVESTIGATES REPORTS OF HARM UNDER AS 47.17, TO 26 (A) PROVIDE A MINIMUM OF SIX WEEKS OF 27 TRAINING UNLESS THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT THE NEW 28 EMPLOYEE HAS SUFFICIENT EXPERIENCE TO JUSTIFY A SHORTER 29 TRAINING PERIOD; 30 (B) LIMIT THE EMPLOYEE'S WORKLOAD AS 31 FOLLOWS: 01 (i) BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF AN 02 EMPLOYEE'S FOURTH MONTH OF WORK WITH THE 03 DEPARTMENT, THE EMPLOYEE MAY SUPERVISE NOT MORE 04 THAN SIX FAMILIES; 05 (ii) AFTER THE BEGINNING OF THE 06 EMPLOYEE'S FOURTH MONTH OF WORK BUT BEFORE THE 07 END OF THE EMPLOYEE'S SIXTH MONTH OF WORK WITH 08 THE DEPARTMENT, THE EMPLOYEE MAY SUPERVISE NOT 09 MORE THAN 12 FAMILIES; 10 (iii) WHEN AN EMPLOYEE SUPERVISES 11 FAMILIES IN A REGION WHERE TRAVEL DISTANCES 12 NEGATIVELY AFFECT THE EMPLOYEE'S ABILITY TO 13 SUPERVISE FAMILIES AND THE EMPLOYEE HAS WORKED 14 FOR THE DEPARTMENT FOR LESS THAN 12 MONTHS, THE 15 EMPLOYEE MAY NOT SUPERVISE THE MAXIMUM NUMBER 16 OF FAMILIES PROVIDED UNDER (i) AND (ii) OF THIS 17 SUBPARAGRAPH; AND 18 (4) FOR AN EMPLOYEE, OTHER THAN A NEW EMPLOYEE, 19 WHO SUPERVISES THE CARE OF CHILDREN COMMITTED TO THE 20 SUPERVISION OR CUSTODY OF THE DEPARTMENT UNDER AS 47.10, 21 WORKS WITH FAMILIES TO PREVENT THE REMOVAL OF A CHILD FROM 22 THE CHILD'S HOME UNDER AS 47.10, OR INVESTIGATES REPORTS OF 23 HARM UNDER AS 47.17, TO ENSURE THAT THE AVERAGE STATEWIDE 24 CASELOAD IS NOT MORE THAN 13 FAMILIES FOR EACH WORKER]. 25 * Sec. 14. AS 47.14.112(c) is amended to read: 26 (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department is 27 immune from suit under this section if the department was unable to meet the 28 workload standards and adjusted workload standards because of a lack of sufficient 29 appropriations or because the department's efforts to recruit or retain employees did 30 not result in an adequate number of qualified applicants to meet the workload 31 standards [, AS OUTLINED IN THE STAFFING REPORT]. 01 * Sec. 15. AS 47.14.112(d) is amended to read: 02 (d) The division of the department with responsibility over the custody of 03 children shall prepare and make available to the legislature an annual report on 04 employee recruitment and retention, including a five-year plan, for the division. Not 05 later than November 15 of each year, the department shall deliver the report to the 06 senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the 07 legislature that the report is available. The report prepared under this subsection [IS 08 SEPARATE FROM THE ANNUAL REPORT TO THE LEGISLATURE 09 REQUIRED UNDER AS 18.05.020 AND] must include, for the previous 12 months, 10 (1) the number of frontline social workers employed by the division, 11 the annual average turnover rate of the workers, and the average caseload of the 12 workers on January 1 and July 1 of that year; 13 (2) the number of children removed from their homes; 14 (3) the achievement of success measured by the following: 15 (A) rate of family reunification; 16 (B) average length of time children spent in custody of the 17 department; 18 (C) rate of placement with an adult family member or family 19 friend; 20 (D) number of children placed in a permanent living 21 arrangement with a guardian or biological or adoptive parent; 22 (E) number of children released from the custody of the 23 department; 24 (4) if the department has met or exceeded the caseload standards under 25 this chapter and, if the standards were exceeded, the number of caseworker positions 26 in the division that could be eliminated and the amount of funding that could be 27 reduced while continuing to meet but not routinely exceed the caseload standards; 28 (5) the performance of the department on federal benchmarks focused 29 on the safety, well-being, and permanent placements of foster children compared with 30 the previous five years. 31 * Sec. 16. AS 03.22.060; AS 05.15.090; AS 16.20.041(f), 16.20.162(f); AS 18.05.020; 01 AS 18.09.070(c); AS 18.15.393; AS 18.29.105(e); AS 18.65.086(b), 18.65.340(c); 02 AS 19.75.111(b)(1); AS 23.15.100(a)(3), 23.15.125(d)(3), 23.15.652(c); AS 33.30.011(a)(12); 03 AS 37.05.035; AS 37.07.040(9), 37.07.040(11), 37.07.080(f); AS 37.10.088(c); 04 AS 37.14.230(a)(8), 37.14.610(6); AS 37.15.170(c); AS 38.04.020(d), 38.04.205; 05 38.05.180(e); AS 39.30.440; AS 41.37.220(f); AS 43.05.085; AS 43.55.180(b); 06 AS 43.90.400(d); AS 44.23.020(b)(7); AS 44.37.027(e); AS 44.41.070(b), 44.41.070(c); 07 AS 46.15.020(b)(5); AS 47.05.270(d); AS 47.07.075(b)(3); AS 47.14.112(b); AS 47.20.350; 08 AS 47.37.040(17); and AS 47.38.100(c) are repealed. 09 * Sec. 17. Section 6, ch. 95, SLA 2005, is repealed. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.